Nevada, session 83, SB164.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 202.366 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.366 1. Upon receipt by a sheriff of an application for a
permit, including an application for the renewal of a permit pursuant
to NRS 202.3677, the sheriff shall conduct an investigation of the
applicant to determine if the applicant is eligible for a permit. In
conducting the investigation, the sheriff shall forward a complete set
of the applicant’s fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report concerning the criminal history of the
applicant. The investigation also must include a report from the
National Instant Criminal Background Check System. The sheriff
shall issue a permit to the applicant unless the applicant is not
qualified to possess a handgun pursuant to state or federal law or is
not otherwise qualified to obtain a permit pursuant to NRS 202.3653
to 202.369, inclusive, or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
-
*SB164*

– 2 –
2. To assist the sheriff in conducting the investigation, any
local law enforcement agency, including the sheriff of any county,
may voluntarily submit to the sheriff a report or other information
concerning the criminal history of an applicant.
3. Within 120 days after a complete application for a permit is
submitted, the sheriff to whom the application is submitted shall
grant or deny the application. If the application is denied, the sheriff
shall send the applicant written notification setting forth the reasons
for the denial. If the application is granted, the sheriff shall provide
the applicant with a permit containing a colored photograph of the
applicant and containing such other information as may be
prescribed by the Department. The permit must be in substantially
the following form:

NEVADA CONCEALED FIREARM PERMIT

County ................................ Permit Number ....................
Expires ................................ Date of Birth ........................
Height ................................. Weight .................................
Name .................................. Address ................................
City ..................................... Zip .......................................
Photograph
Signature ..........................
Issued by ..........................
Date of Issue ....................

4. Unless suspended or revoked by the sheriff who issued the
permit, a permit expires [5] 10 years after the date on which it is
issued.
5. As used in this section, “National Instant Criminal
Background Check System” means the national system created by
the federal Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act, Public Law
103-159.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a permit
to carry a concealed firearm that is issued on or after October 1,
2025.
H
-
*SB164*